Utah statutes.
10-6-143.   City treasurer or deputy -- Duties with respect to issuance of checks.

The treasurer, or in his absence a deputy treasurer appointed by the governing body, shall sign all checks prepared by the auditor or recorder. Prior to affixing the signature, the treasurer or deputy treasurer shall determine that a sufficient amount is on deposit in the appropriate bank account of the city to honor the check. The governing body may also designate a person, other than the city auditor or the city recorder, to countersign checks.

